Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-381
Garbage disposal; levy; tax.

The county board may levy a tax sufficient to cover the contributions required to be made. The levy shall be included in determining the maximum levy that a county is authorized to impose.

Laws 1967, c. 112, § 3, p. 360;

Laws 1999, LB 141, § 4.